Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-63] Appurtenant rights.
Appurtenant rights are preserved. Nothing in this part shall be construed to
deny the exercise of an appurtenant right by the holder thereof at any time. A
permit for water use based on an existing appurtenant right shall be issued
upon application. Such permit shall be subject to sections 174C-26 and 174C-27
and 174C-58 to 174C-62. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next